Wyoming, session 2026, HB0146.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-16-301 and 37-16-302 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 3
SMALL SOLAR GENERATION
HB0146

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0432

37-16-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Electric utility" means any electrical
company or cooperative electric utility that is engaged in
the business of distributing electricity to retail electric
customers in the state;

(ii) "Plug-in solar generation device" or "PIPV"
means a photovoltaic generation device that:

(A) Has a maximum power output of not more
than one thousand two hundred (1,200) watts per meter;

(B) Is designed to be connected to a
building's electrical system through a standard one hundred
twenty (120) volt alternating current outlet;

(C) Is intended primarily to offset part of
the customer's electricity consumption;

HB0146

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0432
(D) Meets the standards of the most recent
version of the national electric code; and

(E) Is certified by the underwriters
laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing
laboratory.

37-16-302. Plug-in solar generation devices;
requirements.

(a) A plug-in solar generation device that meets the
requirements of this article shall be exempt from any
requirement:

(i) For an interconnection agreement for a
person to operate or use the plug-in solar generation
device;

(ii) Associated with the use or operation of a
net metering system under article 1 of this chapter.

(b) Each plug-in solar generation device shall
include a device or feature that prevents the device from
HB0146

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0432
energizing the building's electrical system or backfeeding
into an electric utility's system during a power outage.

(c) No electric utility shall require a customer who
uses or operates a plug-in solar generation device to:

(i) Obtain the approval of the electric utility
before installing or using a plug-in solar generation
device;

(ii) Pay any fee or charge related to the use or
operation of the plug-in solar generation device;

(iii) Install any additional controls or
equipment beyond what is integrated into the plug-in solar
generation device, subject to subsection (b) of this
section.

(d) An electric utility:

(i) May offer to make available to each customer
who uses or operates a plug-in solar generation device an
HB0146

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0432
energy meter that is capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two (2) directions;

(ii) Shall not be liable directly or indirectly
for any damages or injury caused by or associated with the
use of a plug-in solar generation device that is not sold,
leased, installed or operated by the electric utility.

Section 2. W.S. 37-16-101(a)(viii)(intro) is amended
to read:

37-16-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter unless the context or a
specific article otherwise requires:

(viii) "Net metering system" means a facility,
excluding a plug-in solar generation device as defined by
W.S. 37-16-301(a)(ii), for the production of electrical
energy that:

HB0146

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0432
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0146